Tennessee statutes. Title 25 Judgments
Chapter 4

Revival of Judgments

25-4-101. Revival after year and day.

It is not necessary to issue a scire facias to revive a judgment or decree which has lain a year and a day without the issuance of an execution, but same or a writ of possession may be sued out, in such case, after the year and day, as if issued within that time.

Code 1858, § 2987 (deriv. Acts 1849-1850, ch. 37); Shan., § 4715; mod. Code 1932, § 8849; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-401.

Cross-References. Revival when execution sale ineffective, §26-5-114.

Ten year limitation of actions on judgments or decrees, §28-3-110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 70.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

The Abatement of Criminal Fines upon Death of Defendant: Punishment, Precedent, and Policy, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 67.

25-4-102. Death of codefendant.

If there are more defendants than one (1), and any of them die, leaving the codefendant surviving, the plaintiff may proceed by execution against the survivor, and/or revive by scire facias against any or all of the personal representatives of the deceased, to be issued to any county.

Code 1858, § 2988; Shan., § 4716; mod. Code 1932, § 8850; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-402.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 234.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 714.

25-4-103. Judgments of general sessions courts.

Sections 25-4-101 and 25-4-102 shall apply to judgments of the courts of general sessions as well as to judgments of courts of record.

Code 1858, § 2989; Shan., § 4717; Code 1932, § 8851; impl. am. Acts 1979, ch. 68, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-403.

25-4-104. Revival by or against heirs.

A judgment or decree may be revived by or against the heirs of a deceased plaintiff or defendant, in the same manner and under the same circumstances as pending suits are revived under §20-5-104.

Acts 1875, ch. 22, § 1; Shan., § 4718; mod. Code 1932, § 8852; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 25-404.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 234.

Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), §§ 714, 857.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Judgments and Decrees, § 72.

Law Reviews.

The Abatement of Criminal Fines upon Death of Defendant: Punishment, Precedent, and Policy, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 67.